Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1019	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1019	sortir	pudia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1019	sortir	pudies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1019	sortir	pudíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1019	sortir	pudíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1019	sortir	pudien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 1020	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1020	spondre	spondré	.		#futur
SFX 1020	spondre	spondràs	.		#futur
SFX 1020	spondre	spondrà	.		#futur
SFX 1020	spondre	spondrem	.		#futur
SFX 1020	spondre	pondreu	.		#futur
SFX 1020	spondre	spondran	.		#futur

SFX 1021	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1021	tenyir	0/453	.		#present

SFX 1022	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1022	tenyir	0	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 1023	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1023	tenyir	0	.		#perfecte

SFX 1024	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1024	tenyir	0	.		#imperfecte

SFX 1025	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1025	tenyir	0/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 1026	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1026	tenyir	0	.		#hipotetic

SFX 1027	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1027	tenyir	0	.		#futur

SFX 1028	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1028	tenyir	tenyir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1028	tenyir	0/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1028	tenyir	tinya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1028	tenyir	tinyam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1028	tenyir	tinyau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1028	tenyir	tinyen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 1029	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1029	tinar	tine/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1029	tinar	tines/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1029	tinar	tinem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1029	tinar	neu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1029	tinar	tinen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 1030	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1030	tir	c/453	.		#present
SFX 1030	tir	tir/453	.		#present

SFX 1031	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1031	ure	ure/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1031	ure	u/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1031	ure	ja/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1031	ure	jam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1031	ure	jau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1031	ure	gen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 1032	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1032	ure	0	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1032	ure	ure	.		#imperfecte

SFX 1033	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1033	ure	igc/453	.		#present
SFX 1033	ure	us/453	.		#present
SFX 1033	ure	u/453	.		#present
SFX 1033	ure	ïm/453	.		#present
SFX 1033	ure	ïu/453	.		#present
SFX 1033	ure	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 1034	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1034	ure	igga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1034	ure	iggues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1034	ure	iggam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1034	ure	iggau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1034	ure	igguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 1035	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1035	ure	ïra	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1035	ure	ïres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1035	ure	írem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1035	ure	íreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1035	ure	ïren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 1036	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1036	ure	ïa	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1036	ure	ïes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1036	ure	ïem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1036	ure	íeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1036	ure	ïen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 1037	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1037	ure	í	.		#perfecte
SFX 1037	ure	ïres	.		#perfecte
SFX 1037	ure	írem	.		#perfecte
SFX 1037	ure	íreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 1037	ure	ïren	.		#perfecte

SFX 1038	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1038	ure	ure/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1038	ure	igga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1038	ure	iggam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1038	ure	iggau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1038	ure	igguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 1039	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1039	ure	ig/453	.		#present
SFX 1039	ure	ure/453	.		#present

SFX 1040	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1040	ure	ure/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1040	ure	u/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1040	ure	iga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1040	ure	igam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1040	ure	gau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1040	ure	iguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 1041	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1041	ure	0	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 1042	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1042	ure	ví	.		#perfecte
SFX 1042	ure	vires	.		#perfecte
SFX 1042	ure	vírem	.		#perfecte
SFX 1042	ure	víreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 1042	ure	viren	.		#perfecte

SFX 1043	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1043	ure	c/453	.		#present
SFX 1043	ure	us/453	.		#present
SFX 1043	ure	u/453	.		#present
SFX 1043	ure	em/453	.		#present
SFX 1043	ure	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 1044	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1044	ure	c/453	.		#present
SFX 1044	ure	ure/453	.		#present

SFX 1045	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1045	ure	ja/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1045	ure	ges/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1045	ure	jam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1045	ure	jau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1045	ure	gen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 1046	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1046	ure	ea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1046	ure	ees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1046	ure	éem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1046	ure	éeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 1046	ure	een	.		#imperfecte

SFX 1047	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1047	ver	ja/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1047	ver	ges/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1047	ver	jam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1047	ver	jau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 1047	ver	gen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 1048	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1048	ver	guí	.		#perfecte
SFX 1048	ver	gueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 1048	ver	gué	.		#perfecte
SFX 1048	ver	guérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 1048	ver	guéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 1048	ver	gueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 1049	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1049	ver	uria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 1049	ver	uries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 1049	ver	uríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 1049	ver	uríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 1049	ver	urien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 1050	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1050	ver	guera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1050	ver	gueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1050	ver	guérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1050	ver	guéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 1050	ver	gueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 1051	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1051	ver	ver/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1051	ver	ges/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1051	ver	ja/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1051	ver	jam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1051	ver	jau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 1051	ver	gen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 1052	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1052	ver	uré	.		#futur
SFX 1052	ver	uràs	.		#futur
SFX 1052	ver	urà	.		#futur
SFX 1052	ver	urem	.		#futur
SFX 1052	ver	ureu	.		#futur
SFX 1052	ver	uran	.		#futur

SFX 1053	Y	4	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1053	ver	ig/453	.		#present
SFX 1053	ver	ver/453	.		#present
SFX 1053	ver	vem/453	.		#present
SFX 1053	ver	veu/453	.		#present

SFX 1054	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1054	r	t/2	.	
SFX 1054	r	da/2	.	
SFX 1054	r	ts/2	.	
SFX 1054	r	des/2	.	
SFX 1054	r	r/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1055	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1055	ir	ït/2	.	
SFX 1055	ir	ïda/2	.	
SFX 1055	ir	ïts/2	.	
SFX 1055	ir	ïdes/2	.	
SFX 1055	ir	ir/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1056	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1056	dre	gut/2	.	
SFX 1056	dre	guda/2	.	
SFX 1056	dre	guts/2	.	
SFX 1056	dre	gudes/2	.	
SFX 1056	dre	dre/2,453,452	.	

SFX 1057	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 1057	0	/2,453,452	.	
