Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
afluir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
agermanar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
anuir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
aplegar/451,455,456,457,458,477,478,479,480,828,1054
atindre/451,481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,1056
atrontollar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054,1057
avindre/451,481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,1056,1082
badoquejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
benvoler/559,645,646,647,648,650,651,652,693,694,695,696,1057,1078
caseïficar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
conduir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
consonar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
contindre/481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,1056
contravindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,1056
contribuir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
demoldre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1056
derruir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
desacompanyar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
deseixir/455,456,467,468,469,553,554,555,556,557,828,1054,1057
desempenyorar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desnucar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,476,828,1054
desobstruir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
despondre/481,483,484,485,490,492,498,1020,1115
desteixir/455,456,467,468,469,553,554,555,556,557,828,1054,1057
destruir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
desvoler/559,645,646,647,648,650,651,652,693,694,695,696,1057,1078
detindre/481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,1056
disconvindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,1056
disminuir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
domiciliar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
eixir/451,455,456,467,468,469,553,554,555,556,557,828,1054,1057
encaixonar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
enllestir/451,455,456,467,468,469,470,471,472,828,1054
entretindre/451,481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,1056
esbalair/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,561,828,1055
escolanar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
expectar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
gargallejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
gratinar/455,456,457,458,459,461,462,828,878,1029,1054
haver/451,559,883,1047,1048,1049,1050,1051,1052,1053,1057,1124
imbuir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
instruir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
jaure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,951,952,1057,1061
mamarruchar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
mantindre/481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,1056
obeir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
obtindre/451,481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,702,703,704,705,706,707,708,709,1056
oure/451,481,482,509,624,625,626,627,628,629,994,1031,1033,1034,1035,1037,1038,1039,1041,1045,1123
planydre/451,481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1056
poetisar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
previndre/451,481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,566,567,568,569,570,571,572,573,1056
produir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
reconstituir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
reconvindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,566,567,568,569,570,571,572,573,1056
refluir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
renovar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
rescriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,624,625,626,627,628,629,1041,1064
revindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,566,567,568,569,570,571,572,573,1056
rostir/455,456,467,468,469,828,988,989,990,991,992,993,1054,1057
seduir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
sostindre/481,482,483,484,485,492,513,515,702,703,704,705,706,707,708,709,1056
subscriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,624,625,626,627,628,629,1041,1064
supervindre/481,482,483,484,485,513,515,517,566,567,568,569,570,571,572,573,1056
tempestejar/455,456,457,458,463,464,465,466,828,1054
traduir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,828,1055
traure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1057,1066
valdre/481,482,483,484,485,490,492,498,1056
voler/559,645,646,647,648,650,651,652,693,694,695,696,1057,1078
